Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202530-2630.01
Temporary conservator; power of court.

(a) If a person alleged to be in need of protection under section 30-2630 has no conservator and an emergency exists, the court may, pending notice and hearing, exercise the power of a conservator or enter an emergency protective order appointing a temporary conservator, who may be the Public Guardian, to address the emergency.

(b) When the court takes action to exercise the powers of a conservator or to appoint a temporary conservator under subsection (a) of this section, an expedited hearing shall be held if requested by the person alleged to be in need of protection, or by any interested person, if the request is filed more than ten business days prior to the date set for the hearing on the petition for appointment of the conservator. If an expedited hearing is to be held, the hearing shall be held within ten business days after the request is received. At the hearing on the temporary appointment, the petitioner shall have the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that temporary conservatorship continues to be necessary to address the emergency situation. Unless the person alleged to be in need of protection has counsel of his or her own choice, the court may appoint an attorney to represent the person at the hearing as provided in section 30-2636.

(c) If an expedited hearing is requested, notice shall be served as provided in section 30-2634. The notice shall specify that a temporary conservator has been appointed and shall be given at least twenty-four hours prior to the expedited hearing.

(d) At the expedited hearing, the court may render a judgment authorizing the temporary conservatorship to continue beyond the original ten-day period. The judgment shall prescribe the specific powers and duties of the temporary conservator in the letters of temporary conservatorship and shall be effective for a ninety-day period. For good cause shown, the court may extend the temporary conservatorship for successive ninety-day periods.

(e) The temporary conservatorship shall terminate at the end of the ninety-day period in which the temporary conservatorship is valid or at any time prior thereto if the court deems the circumstances leading to the order for temporary conservatorship no longer exist or if an order has been entered as a result of a hearing pursuant to section 30-2636 which has been held during the ninety-day period.

(f) If the court denies the request for the ex parte order, the court may, in its discretion, enter an order for an expedited hearing pursuant to subsections (b) through (e) of this section.

(g) If the petitioner requests the entry of an order of temporary conservatorship pursuant to subsection (a) of this section without requesting an ex parte order, the court may hold an expedited hearing pursuant to subsections (b) through (e) of this section.

(h) A temporary conservator may be removed at any time. A temporary conservator shall make any report the court requires, except that a temporary conservator shall not be required to provide the fingerprints for the national criminal history record information check and report under section 30-2602.02. In other respects the provisions of the Nebraska Probate Code concerning conservators apply to temporary conservators.

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 41;

Laws 2014, LB920, § 24;

Laws 2025, LB453, § 3.